Washington statutes.
RCW 5.28.060

Affirmation equivalent to oath.

Whenever an oath is required, an affirmation, as prescribed in RCW 5.28.050 is to be deemed equivalent thereto, and a false affirmation is to be deemed perjury, equally with a false oath.

[2 H. C. s1698; 1869 p 379 s 6; RRS s 1269.]

NOTES:

Perjury: Chapter 9A.72 RCW.